Washington statutes.
RCW 39.104.120

Use of tax revenue for bond repayment.

A sponsoring local government that issues bonds under RCW 39.104.110 to finance public improvements may pledge for the payment of such bonds all or part of any local property tax allocation revenues derived from the public improvements. The sponsoring local government may also pledge all or part of any revenues derived from taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.510 and held in connection with the public improvements. All of such tax revenues are subject to the use restriction in RCW 82.14.515.

[ 2009 c 270 s 702.]